Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2031.06
Termination of employment prior to eligibility to retire; rejoining system; effect.

An officer who terminates employment prior to becoming eligible to retire and again serves as an officer in the Nebraska State Patrol may elect to repay part or all of the amount he or she had withdrawn as a refund pursuant to section 81-2031 plus the interest that would have accrued on such amount. Payment shall commence prior to termination of employment, shall not be extended more than five years after the date the officer elects to repay his or her refund, and shall be completed prior to termination of employment. Prior service and rights shall be restored in proportion to the amounts repaid, and the prior service and rights of the officer shall be fully restored only if he or she repays all accumulated withdrawals plus interest which would have accrued on that amount.

Laws 2001, LB 408, § 24.